Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1309
Recall petition filing form prohibited; when.

No recall petition filing form shall be filed against an elected official within twelve months after a recall election has failed to remove him or her from office or within six months after the beginning of his or her term of office or within six months prior to the incumbent filing deadline for the office.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 382;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 61.